Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Article 5. Factual Declaration of Innocence after Identity Theft; Right to File Police Report Regarding Identity Theft.

Sec. 45.48.600.
Factual declaration of innocence after identity theft.

A victim of identity theft may petition the superior court for a determination that the victim is factually innocent of a crime if

the perpetrator of the identity theft was arrested for, cited for, or convicted of the crime using the victim’s identity;

a criminal complaint was filed against the perpetrator of the identity theft; and

the victim’s identity was mistakenly associated with a record of a conviction for a crime.

In addition to a petition by a victim under (a) of this section, the department may petition the superior court for a determination under (a) of this section, or the superior court may, on its own motion, make a determination under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.610.
Basis for determination.

A determination of factual innocence under AS

45.48.600

may be heard and made on declarations, affidavits, police reports, or other material, relevant, and reliable information submitted by the parties or ordered to be made a part of the record by the court.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.620.
Criteria for determination; court order.

A court may determine that a petitioner under AS

45.48.600

is factually innocent of a crime if the court finds beyond a reasonable doubt that

the petitioner is a victim of identity theft;

the petitioner did not commit the offense for which the perpetrator of the identity theft was arrested, cited, or convicted;

the petitioner filed a criminal complaint against the perpetrator of the identity theft; and

the petitioner’s identity was mistakenly associated with a record of conviction for the crime.

If a court finds under this section that the victim is factually innocent of a crime, the court shall issue an order indicating this determination of factual innocence and shall provide the victim with a copy of the order.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.630.
Orders regarding records.

After a court issues an order under AS

45.48.620

, the court may order the name and associated personal information of the victim of identity theft that is contained in the files, indexes, and other records of the court that are accessible by the public labeled to show that the name and personal information of the victim of identity theft is incorrect.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.640.
Vacation of determination.

A court that has issued an order under AS

45.48.620

may, at any time, vacate the order if the petition, or any information submitted in support of the petition, is found to contain a material misrepresentation, an omission, or false information.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For the effect of this section on Rule 60(b), Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, relating to the authority of a court to vacate an order, see § 6(a), ch. 92, SLA 2008 in the 2008 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 45.48.650.
Court form.

The supreme court of the state may develop a form to be used for the order under AS

45.48.620

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.660.
Database.

The department may establish and maintain a database of individuals who have been victims of identity theft and who have received an order under AS

45.48.620

. The department shall provide a victim or the victim’s authorized representative access to a database established under this section to establish that the individual has been a victim of identity theft. Access to the database established under this section is limited to criminal justice agencies, victims of identity theft, and individuals and agencies authorized by the victims.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.670.
Toll-free telephone number.

The department may establish and maintain a toll-free telephone number to provide access to information in a database established under AS

45.48.660

.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.680.
Right to file police report regarding identity theft.

Even if the local law enforcement agency does not have jurisdiction over the theft of an individual’s identity, if an individual who has learned or reasonably suspects the individual has been the victim of identity theft contacts, for the purpose of filing a complaint, a local law enforcement agency that has jurisdiction over the individual’s actual place of residence, the local law enforcement agency shall make a report of the matter and provide the individual with a copy of the report. The local law enforcement agency may refer the matter to a law enforcement agency in a different jurisdiction.

This section is not intended to interfere with the discretion of a local law enforcement agency to allocate its resources to the investigation of crime. A local law enforcement agency is not required to count a complaint filed under (a) of this section as an open case for purposes that include compiling statistics on its open cases.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)

Sec. 45.48.690.
Definitions.

In AS

45.48.600

—

45.48.690

,

“crime” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“department” means the Department of Law;

“perpetrator” means the person who perpetrated the theft of an individual’s identity;

“victim” means an individual who is the victim of identity theft.

History.

(§ 4 ch 92 SLA 2008)